Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.150

Revenue bonds—Signatures—Form.

Every revenue bond and any coupon shall be signed by the mayor and attested by the clerk. The seal of the city or town shall be attached to all bonds but not to any coupons. Signatures on any coupons may be printed or may be the lithographic facsimile of the signatures. The bonds shall be printed, engraved or lithographed upon good bond paper.

[ 1983 c 167 s 60; 1965 c 7 s 35.67.150. Prior: 1941 c 193 s 4, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9354-7, part.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.